Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-151
Sewerage system; establishment; borrowing money; conditions precedent.

Before submitting any proposition for borrowing money for the purposes mentioned in section 17-150, the mayor and council shall determine upon a system of sewerage and shall procure from the city engineer an estimate of the actual cost of such system and of the cost of so much thereof as the mayor and council may propose to construct, with the amount proposed to be borrowed and the plans of such system. Such estimate shall be placed and remain in the hands of the city clerk, subject to public inspection during all the time such proposition to borrow money shall be pending. After such system shall have been adopted, no change shall be made therein involving an expense of more than one thousand dollars, nor shall any system be adopted in lieu thereof, unless authorized by a vote of the people.

Laws 1903, c. 22, § 4, p. 256;

R.S.1913, § 5045;

C.S.1922, § 4214;

C.S.1929, § 17-153;

R.S.1943, § 17-151.